Illinois, session 104th, HB5677.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated from the 7General Revenue Fund for the objects and purposes hereinafter 8named to meet the ordinary and contingent expenses of the 9State Employees' Retirement System of Illinois:10SOCIAL SECURITY DIVISION11  For Operational Expenses.............................27,40012CENTRAL OFFICE13  For Employee Retirement Contributions14   Paid by Employer for Prior Fiscal Years.............10,000 15ARTICLE 216    Section 5. The sum of $1,838,482,920, or so much thereof 17as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 18Fund to the State Employees' Retirement System of Illinois for 19the State's contribution, as provided by law. 20    Section 10. The sum of $154,166,000, or so much thereof as   HB5677- 2 -OMB104 00274 JCB 10274 b1may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 2Fund to the Judges Retirement System of Illinois for the 3State's contribution, as provided by law. 4    Section 15. The sum of $25,650,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the General Assembly Retirement System for the State's 7contribution, as provided by law. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92026.